North Carolina, session 2025, HB443.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 7(3) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"(3) Vacancies. If the office of any of these officers is vacated by death, resignation, or
otherwise, it shall be the duty of the Governor to appoint another to serve until his a successor is
elected and qualified. Every such vacancy shall be filled by election at the first election for
members of the General Assembly that occurs more than 60 days after the vacancy has taken
place, and the person chosen shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term fixed
in this Section. When a vacancy occurs in the office of any of the officers named in this Section
and the term expires on the first day of January succeeding the next election for members of the
General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the
office. If the officer was elected as the nominee of a political party, the Governor shall appoint
from a list of three qualified persons recommended by the political party with which the vacating
officer was affiliated at the time of election, if that political party makes a recommendation within
30 days of the occurrence of the vacancy."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. The
election shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The question
to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to require the Governor to fill a vacancy in the office of
Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction, Attorney General,
Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and Commissioner of Insurance by
selecting from a list of nominees submitted by the political party with which the vacating officer
was affiliated when elected, if applicable and submitted."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
*H443-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 443-First Edition